Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-3205
Awards; review; distribute to eligible postsecondary educational institutions.

(1) Within thirty days after receiving recommendations pursuant to section 85-3204, the commission shall review the recommended awards for compliance with the Door to College Scholarship Act and any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act and notify each eligible postsecondary educational institution of the approval or disapproval of recommended awards.

(2) For purposes of such approval or disapproval of recommended awards, the submission of an application by a student for a scholarship pursuant to the Door to College Scholarship Act shall authorize the Department of Health and Human Services to verify for the commission the applicant's name and previous status at a youth rehabilitation and treatment center in order to determine a student's eligibility under subdivision (6)(a) of section 85-3202.

(3) The commission shall distribute to each eligible postsecondary educational institution the total award amount approved for eligible students at such institution. The eligible postsecondary educational institution shall act as an agent of the commission to disburse the awards directly to eligible students during the award year.

Laws 2023, LB705, § 32;

Laws 2024, LB1270, § 3.